pl/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/pl.aff
SFX g Y 100
SFX g   ać        ący       zać
SFX g   ać        ących     zać
SFX g   ać        ącym      zać
SFX g   ać        ącymi     zać
SFX g   ać        ące       zać
SFX g   ać        ącego     zać
SFX g   ać        ącemu     zać
SFX g   ać        ącej      zać
SFX g   ać        ąca       zać
SFX g   ać        ącą       zać
SFX g   ć         jący      [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jących    [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jącym     [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jącymi    [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jące      [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jącego    [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jącemu    [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jącej     [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jąca      [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jącą      [cz]ieć
SFX g   ć         jący      zeć
SFX g   ć         jących    zeć
SFX g   ć         jącym     zeć
SFX g   ć         jącymi    zeć
SFX g   ć         jące      zeć
SFX g   ć         jącego    zeć
SFX g   ć         jącemu    zeć
SFX g   ć         jącej     zeć
SFX g   ć         jąca      zeć
SFX g   ć         jącą      zeć
SFX g   ać        ujący     iwać
SFX g   ać        ujących   iwać
SFX g   ać        ującym    iwać
SFX g   ać        ującymi   iwać
SFX g   ać        ujące     iwać
SFX g   ać        ującego   iwać
SFX g   ać        ującemu   iwać
SFX g   ać        ującej    iwać
SFX g   ać        ująca     iwać
SFX g   ać        ującą     iwać
SFX g   ć         jący      mieć
SFX g   ć         jących    mieć
SFX g   ć         jącym     mieć
SFX g   ć         jącymi    mieć
SFX g   ć         jące      mieć
SFX g   ć         jącego    mieć
SFX g   ć         jącemu    mieć
SFX g   ć         jącej     mieć
SFX g   ć         jąca      mieć
SFX g   ć         jącą      mieć
SFX g   ieć       ący       nieć
SFX g   ieć       ących     nieć
SFX g   ieć       ącym      nieć
SFX g   ieć       ącymi     nieć
SFX g   ieć       ące       nieć
SFX g   ieć       ącego     nieć
SFX g   ieć       ącemu     nieć
SFX g   ieć       ącej      nieć
SFX g   ieć       ąca       nieć
SFX g   ieć       ącą       nieć
SFX g   eć        ący       leć
SFX g   eć        ących     leć
SFX g   eć        ącym      leć
SFX g   eć        ącymi     leć
SFX g   eć        ące       leć
SFX g   eć        ącego     leć
SFX g   eć        ącemu     leć
SFX g   eć        ącej      leć
SFX g   eć        ąca       leć
SFX g   eć        ącą       leć
SFX g   ać        ący       lać
SFX g   ać        ących     lać
SFX g   ać        ącym      lać
SFX g   ać        ącymi     lać
SFX g   ać        ące       lać
SFX g   ać        ącego     lać
SFX g   ać        ącemu     lać
SFX g   ać        ącej      lać
SFX g   ać        ąca       lać
SFX g   ać        ącą       lać
SFX g   kać       zczący    kać
SFX g   kać       zczących  kać
SFX g   kać       zczącym   kać
SFX g   kać       zczącymi  kać
SFX g   kać       zczące    kać
SFX g   kać       zczącego  kać
SFX g   kać       zczącemu  kać
SFX g   kać       zczącej   kać
SFX g   kać       zcząca    kać
SFX g   kać       zczącą    kać
SFX g   ać        ący       [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ących     [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ącym      [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ącymi     [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ące       [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ącego     [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ącemu     [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ącej      [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ąca       [^i]wać
SFX g   ać        ącą       [^i]wać
